Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1106
Learners with high ability; purpose of sections.

The purpose of sections 79-1106 to 79-1108.03 is to assist and encourage all school districts in the development, improvement, and implementation of accelerated or differentiated curriculum programs that will serve the educational needs of learners with high ability at levels appropriate for their abilities.

Laws 1994, LB 647, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4001;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 788;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 34;

Laws 1998, LB 1229, § 6.